District of Columbia statutes.
39-303

Corporate powers.

The Museum may exercise those powers conferred upon a nonprofit corporation in Chapters 1, 2, and 4 of Title 29.

History

July 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-79, § 4, 27 DCR 2546
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(ee), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2103.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-378 substituted “Chapters 1, 2, and 4 of Title 29” for “Chapter 3 of Title 29”.